Utah statutes.
20A-16-408.   Receipt of voted ballot.

(1)  Except as provided by Section 20A-1-308, a valid military-overseas ballot cast in accordance with Section 20A-16-404 shall be counted if the military-overseas ballot is delivered by the end of business on the business day before the latest deadline for completing the canvass to the address that the appropriate state or local election office has specified.

(2)  If, at the time of completing a military-overseas ballot and balloting materials, the voter has declared under penalty of perjury as provided in Title 76, Chapter 8, Part 5, Falsification in Official Matters, that the ballot was timely submitted, the ballot may not be rejected on the basis that it has a late postmark, an unreadable postmark, or no postmark.



Amended by Chapter 219, 2013 General Session

